Massachusetts, session 194th, H2740.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. This act shall commonly be known as "Colby's Law".
SECTION 2. For the purposes of this act, the following terms shall have the following
meanings:-
“BMX track” refers to a facility designed for bicycle motocross racing.
“Motocross track” refers to a facility designed for off-road motorcycle racing.
“Operator” refers to any person, organization, or entity responsible for managing or
overseeing the operation of a BMX or motocross track.
“Participant” refers to any individual who actively engages in riding or competing on the
track.
of 3

SECTION 3. (a) All BMX and motocross tracks operating in Massachusetts must be
registered with the Executive Office of Public Safety and Security.
(b) Annual permits shall be required for continued operation and shall be issued
following inspection by the Executive Office of Public Safety and Security to ensure compliance
with safety standards established by this act.
SECTION 5. (a) Tracks must meet minimum design and maintenance standards,
including but not limited to:
(1) Proper grading and surfacing to reduce hazards.
(2) Barriers and safety netting to protect spectators
(3) Clearly marked areas for participants and spectators.
(b) Emergency medical response plans, including:
(1). On-site availability of first aid and automated external defibrillators (AEDs).
(2) A certified medical professional present during events.
(3) Established protocols for contacting emergency services.
(4) Mandatory signage displaying track rules, safety requirements, and emergency
contacts.
SECTION 6. (a) Riders and participants must wear appropriate protective equipment,
including:
(1) Helmets meeting U.S. Consumer Product Safety Commission (CPSC) standards.
of 3

(2) Elbow and knee pads, gloves, and body armor for motocross riders.
(b) Tracks must conduct safety briefings for new participants.
SECTION 7. All operators must maintain liability insurance to cover injuries or damages
occurring on the premises.
SECTION 8. (a) Riders under 18 years of age must have written parental or guardian
consent to participate.
(b) Special safety measures, such as speed limitations and restricted access to advanced
courses, shall be implemented for youth riders.
SECTION 9. (a) The Executive Office of Public Safety and Security shall have the
authority to enforce this act through inspections, fines, or suspension of operating permits for
non-compliance.
(b) Violations of this act may result in fines ranging from $500 to $5,000 depending on
the severity of the infraction.
SECTION 10. The Executive Office of Public Safety and Security shall develop and
implement a statewide public awareness campaign about track safety, including educational
materials and training programs.
of 3